Washington statutes.
RCW 43.167.070

Central district community preservation and development authority.

(1) The legislature finds that the Central district is identified as the oldest surviving residential neighborhood in Seattle where, historically, residents who faced housing and economic discrimination elsewhere in the city could settle and raise families, resulting in a richly diverse multicultural community. The legislature also finds that the Central district is widely recognized as the historical center of the Seattle African American community which is reflected in the historic buildings, institutions, and culture of the neighborhood. The legislature further finds that the Central district has been adversely impacted by public works, capital projects with significant public funding, and other land use decisions which have contributed to dislocation, displacement, and the disintegration of an identifiable existing community and its historical and cultural character. In addition, the legislature finds that members of the community who meet the definition of constituency contained in RCW 43.167.003(3) have submitted a proposal to form a community preservation and development authority to preserve, restore, and enhance the unique, history, culture, and character of the Central district.

(2) The legislature authorizes the establishment of the Central district community preservation and development authority, which boundaries are those contained in the Central district within the city of Seattle, to preserve the unique character and history of the area pursuant to RCW 43.167.007.

[ 2019 c 447 s 5.]